New Jersey, session 222, A451.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    This act shall be known and may be cited as the New Economy Opportunity Skills System Act. 2.    The Legislature finds and declares that: a.     Because New Jersey needs a skilled workforce to compete in the global economy and to promote economic mobility for residents, the State seeks to create a more efficient and seamless service delivery model for local workforce and economic development by better aligning State workforce development services, community colleges, and post-secondary programs in county vocational school districts; b.    Strengthening strategic coordination between these entities will enhance the delivery of training and services, address labor market needs, and provide a skilled talent pipeline to meet the demands of employers throughout New Jersey; and c.     Community colleges and post-secondary programs in county vocational school districts are well-positioned to serve as the preferred provider of postsecondary education, workforce training, and adult literacy programs, supporting job seekers, workers, and individuals receiving public assistance in career preparation and employment. 3.    As used in this act: Community college means a county college established pursuant to chapter 64A of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes. County vocational school district means any entity established pursuant to article 3 of chapter 54 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes for the purpose of providing efficient occupational, technical and academic education opportunities to secondary and postsecondary students. Local workforce development board means the local board established in each designated service delivery area pursuant to the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. s.3101 et seq.). State Employment and Training Commission or commission means the State Employment and Training Commission created pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1989, c.293 (C.34:15C-2). 4.    a. To establish the New Economy Opportunity Skills System Pilot Program, the State Employment and Training Commission shall initiate a pilot program in three local areas to strengthen strategic alignment and collaboration between the operations of local workforce development boards, community colleges, and post-secondary programs in county vocational school districts.  The pilot program shall include: (1)   joint development and implementation of workforce training programs with an emphasis on industry-recognized credentials; (2)   collaborative efforts for branding, outreach, and marketing to increase awareness of available training and career services; (3)   integrated planning and coordination of funding resources to maximize the impact of State and federal support for workforce development; and (4)   performance evaluations based on appropriate metrics aligned with State and federal workforce development programs to assess participant outcomes, program effectiveness and other measures as required under the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, (29 U.S.C. s.3101 et seq.) and applicable State laws; b.    The commission, in consultation with the New Jersey Council of County Colleges and the New Jersey Council of County Vocational-Technical Schools, shall develop a strategy to strengthen Statewide strategic alignment and collaboration between local workforce development boards, community colleges, and post-secondary programs in county vocational school districts.  The strategy shall include: (1)   a guideline for scaling the pilot program established pursuant to subsection a. of this section to other areas throughout the State; (2)   recommendations for legislative and regulatory changes needed to facilitate integration; and (3)   an implementation timeline and resource plan for Statewide integration. c.     The commission shall submit an annual report to the Governor and to the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), on the progress and outcomes of the pilot program and the implementation of the New Economy Opportunity Skills System Pilot Program.  The report shall include: (1)   data on participant outcomes, including but not limited to employment rates, credential attainment, wage increases, and other appropriate metrics aligned with State and federal workforce development programs and applicable State laws; (2)   recommendations for improvements or adjustments to the New Economy Opportunity Skills System Pilot Program; and (3)   an update on the Statewide integration strategy and its implementation. 5.    Community colleges and post-secondary programs in county vocational school districts shall be the preferred providers of postsecondary education and workforce training programs for State workforce development services.  Community colleges and county vocational school districts shall also be designated as the lead providers of adult literacy programs under State workforce development services, with the responsibility to collaborate with the Department of Human Services on efforts to assist public assistance recipients in obtaining employment and preparing for career opportunities. 6.    There are appropriated such amounts as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of the bill, subject to the approval of the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting, in consultation with the Executive Director of the State Employment and Training Commission. If federal funds become available to effectuate the purposes of this act, the State Employment and Training Commission shall utilize such federal funds to the extent such funds are certified as available by the Director of the Division of Budget and Accounting.  If federal funds are not available to effectuate the purposes of this act, State funds shall first be appropriated from the New Jersey Workforce Development Partnership Fund and then from the Supplemental Workforce Fund for Basic Skills. 7.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire three years after the effective date, but the Chairperson of the State Employment and Training Commission may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as may be necessary for the implementation of this act.